Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8578.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-8.11 of the General Laws entitled "Family Caregivers Support
Act of 2013" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8.11-4. Family caregiver workplace protection.
(a) It shall be unlawful and a violation of fair employment practices pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 5 of title 28 for an employer:
(1) To fail or refuse to hire an applicant as an employee of such employer solely because
of the family caregiver responsibilities of the applicant;
(2) To take adverse action against an employee of such employer or otherwise discriminate
against an employee, with respect to compensation, terms, conditions or privileges of employment
because of the family caregiver responsibilities of the employee; or
(3) To deny a request by the family caregiver for flexible scheduling, remote work or
adjusted hours to accommodate family caregiving therapy, medical appointments or other
caregiving needs unless the said request causes undue hardship for the employer including, but not
limited to, significant difficulty or expense to the employer's operation or business.
(b) It shall be an affirmative defense to an alleged violation of subsection (a) of this section
for a small employer of less than twenty-five (25) employees, if:
(1) Compliance would cause undue hardship to the employer and the employer has made
a good faith effort to comply with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section that could be
implemented without causing undue hardship; or

(2) The employer has adopted a reasonable phased plan for compliance and the alleged
violation and conduct concerns a portion of the plan which had not been implemented at the time
of the alleged violation.
(c) The commission for human rights shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement
and enforce the provisions of this section pursuant to § 28-5-13.
(d) The commission for human rights, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 5 of title 28,
shall conduct investigations and hearings of alleged violations and upon a finding of a violation
may order remedies to include reinstatement, back pay, compensation for lost benefits and
attorneys' fees.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006483
========
LC006483 - Page 2 of 3